Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1135.
do enact as follows:SB1135,11Section 1. 302.107 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1135,2,62302.107 (2) Upon revocation of parole or extended supervision under s. 302.11 3(7), 302.113 (9), 302.114 (9), or 304.06 (3) or (3g), the department shall make a 4reasonable effort to send a notice of the revocation to a victim of an offense 5committed by the inmate, if the victim can be found, in accordance with sub. (3) and 6after receiving a completed card under sub. (4).SB1135,27Section 2. 302.11 (7) (ag) of the statutes is renumbered 302.11 (7) (ag) 8(intro.) and amended to read:SB1135,2,99302.11 (7) (ag) (intro.) In this subsection “reviewing:SB1135,3,2102. “Reviewing authority” means the division of hearings and appeals in the 1department of administration, upon proper notice and hearing, or the department 2of corrections, if the parolee waives a hearing.SB1135,33Section 3. 302.11 (7) (am) of the statutes is renumbered 302.11 (7) (am) 1. 4(intro.) and amended to read:SB1135,3,85302.11 (7) (am) 1. (intro.) The reviewing authority may not return a parolee 6released under sub. (1) or (1g) (b) or s. 304.02 or 304.06 (1) to prison for a period up 7to the remainder of the sentence for a violation of the conditions of parole. The 8remainder unless one of the following applies:SB1135,3,109(ag) 1. “Remainder of the sentence is” means the entire sentence, less time 10served in custody prior to parole.SB1135,3,1411(am) 2. If the reviewing authority revokes parole, the revocation order may 12return the parolee to prison for a period up to the remainder of the sentence. The 13revocation order shall provide the parolee with credit in accordance with ss. 14304.072 and 973.155.SB1135,415Section 4. 302.11 (7) (am) 1. a. to d. of the statutes are created to read:SB1135,3,1816302.11 (7) (am) 1. a. The parolee committed 3 or more independent violations 17while released on parole that endangered another person or caused damage to 18another person’s property.SB1135,3,2019b. The condition that the parolee violated was a condition that the parolee not 20contact any specified individual.SB1135,3,2321c. The parolee was required to register as a sex offender under s. 301.45 and 22the violation of the condition of parole was related to the sex offense for which the 23parolee was required to register as a sex offender.SB1135,4,21d. When the parolee violated the condition of parole, the parolee also allegedly 2committed a crime for which charges have been filed.SB1135,53Section 5. 302.113 (8m) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 302.113 (8m).SB1135,64Section 6. 302.113 (8m) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB1135,75Section 7. 302.113 (9) (ag) of the statutes is renumbered 302.113 (9) (ag) 6(intro.) and amended to read:SB1135,4,77302.113 (9) (ag) (intro.) In this subsection “reviewing:SB1135,4,1082. “Reviewing authority” means the division of hearings and appeals in the 9department of administration, upon proper notice and hearing, or the department 10of corrections, if the person on extended supervision waives a hearing.SB1135,811Section 8. 302.113 (9) (ag) 1. of the statutes is created to read:SB1135,4,1212302.113 (9) (ag) 1. “Crime” has the meaning given in s. 939.12.SB1135,913Section 9. 302.113 (9) (am) of the statutes is renumbered 302.113 (9) (am) 1. 14(intro.) and amended to read:SB1135,4,1815302.113 (9) (am) 1. (intro.) If a person released to extended supervision under 16this section violates a condition of extended supervision, the reviewing authority 17may not revoke the extended supervision of the person. unless one of the following 18applies:SB1135,4,22192. If the extended supervision of the person is revoked under subd. 1., the 20reviewing authority shall order the person to be returned to prison for any specified 21period of time that does not exceed the time remaining on the bifurcated sentence. 22The timeSB1135,5,423(ag) 3. “Time remaining on the bifurcated sentence is” means the total length 1of the bifurcated sentence, less time served by the person in confinement under the 2sentence before release to extended supervision under sub. (2) and less all time 3served in confinement for previous revocations of extended supervision under the 4sentence.SB1135,5,75(am) 3. The order returning a person to prison under this paragraph subd. 2. 6shall provide the person whose extended supervision was revoked with credit in 7accordance with ss. 304.072 and 973.155.SB1135,108Section 10. 302.113 (9) (am) 1. a. to d. of the statutes are created to read:SB1135,5,119302.113 (9) (am) 1. a. The person committed 3 or more independent violations 10during his or her term of extended supervision that endangered another person or 11caused damage to another person’s property.SB1135,5,1312b. The condition that the person violated was a condition that the person not 13contact any specified individual.SB1135,5,1614c. The person was required to register as a sex offender under s. 301.45 and 15the violation of the condition of extended supervision was related to the sex offense 16for which the person was required to register as a sex offender.SB1135,5,1817d. When the person violated the condition of extended supervision, the person 18also allegedly committed a crime for which charges have been filed.SB1135,1119Section 11. 302.113 (9) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1135,6,420302.113 (9) (b) A person who is returned to prison after revocation of extended 21supervision shall be incarcerated for the entire period of time specified by the order 22under par. (am) 2. The period of time specified under par. (am) 2. may be extended 23in accordance with sub. (3). If a person is returned to prison under par. (am) 2. for 1a period of time that is less than the time remaining on the bifurcated sentence, the 2person shall be released to extended supervision after he or she has served the 3period of time specified by the order under par. (am) 2. and any periods of extension 4imposed in accordance with sub. (3).SB1135,125Section 12. 302.113 (9) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1135,6,146302.113 (9) (c) A person who is subsequently released to extended supervision 7after service of the period of time specified by the order under par. (am) 2. is subject 8to all conditions and rules under sub. (7) and, if applicable, sub. (7m) until the 9expiration of the time remaining extended supervision portion of on the bifurcated 10sentence. The remaining extended supervision portion of the bifurcated sentence is 11the total length of the bifurcated sentence, less the time served by the person in 12confinement under the bifurcated sentence before release to extended supervision 13under sub. (2) and less all time served in confinement for previous revocations of 14extended supervision under the bifurcated sentence.SB1135,1315Section 13. 302.114 (9) (ag) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1135,6,1716302.114 (9) (ag) In this subsection “reviewing authority” has the meaning 17given in s. 302.113 (9) (ag) 2.SB1135,1418Section 14. 302.33 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1135,7,319302.33 (1) The maintenance of persons who have been sentenced to the state 20penal institutions; persons in the custody of the department, except as provided in 21sub. (2) and ss. 301.048 (7), 302.113 (8m), and 302.114 (8m); persons accused of 22crime and committed for trial; persons committed for the nonpayment of fines and 23expenses; and persons sentenced to imprisonment therein, while in the county jail, 1shall be paid out of the county treasury. No claim may be allowed to any sheriff for 2keeping or boarding any person in the county jail unless the person was lawfully 3detained therein.SB1135,154Section 15. 303.08 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1135 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1135 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1135 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1135 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1135: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting